Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 1 General Provisions
25-1-302. Members of specified executive branch boards and commissions not to be members of the General Assembly.

As soon as possible after April 13, 1999, the appointing authorities shall replace members of the General Assembly serving on executive branch boards and commissions identified below with persons who are not members of the General Assembly:

Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Coordinating Council, § 20-64-1002;

Arkansas Alternative Dispute Resolution Commission, § 16-7-102;

Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission, § 22-3-502;

Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission, § 20-82-201;

Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center, § 12-12-202;

Arkansas Early Childhood Commission, § 20-78-501;

State Interagency Council, § 20-14-508;

[Repealed.]

Trauma Advisory Council, § 20-13-807;

Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission, § 25-24-101;

Mansion Advisory Council, § 22-3-806;

Arkansas Minority Health Commission, § 20-2-102;

Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Council, § 15-12-101;

Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission, § 15-20-304;

Arkansas Pygmalion Commission on Nontraditional Education, uncodified Act 1288 of 1993, as amended [abolished];

Arkansas Rural Development Commission, § 15-6-104;

Public School Motor Vehicle Insurance Program Advisory Committee, § 6-21-711 [repealed];

Board of Directors of the Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, § 15-3-105;

Arkansas Sentencing Commission, § 16-90-802;

[Repealed.]

State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board, § 21-5-402;

Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Oversight Board, § 20-76-105 [repealed];

Arkansas Public Transportation Coordination Council, § 27-3-103;

[Repealed.]

Workers' Compensation Commission, § 11-9-201; and

Career Education and Workforce Development Board, § 25-30-101.

Hereafter, and not withstanding any law to the contrary, no member of the General Assembly shall be appointed to any executive branch board or commission identified in subsection (a) of this section. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall make a determination concerning any other board or commission having legislative members. If the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives determine that legislative service on the board or commission would violate the Supreme Court's decision in State Bd. of Workforce Educ. and Career Opportunities v. King, 336 Ark. 409, 985 S.W.2d 731 (1999), they shall notify the appointing authority, who shall appoint a person who is not a member of the General Assembly as a replacement for the legislative member.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 62, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority.

“(a)(1)The Arkansas Science and Technology Authority is transferred to the Arkansas Economic Development Commission by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)For the purposes of this act, the commission is the principal department under Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, of the authority are transferred to the commission, except as specified in this act.

“(c)The prescribed powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing; promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards; and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudication of the authority are transferred to the executive director of the commission, except as specified in this act.

“(d)The members of the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the board except as specified in this act.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted (a)(24) and redesignated the subsequent subdivisions accordingly.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 rewrote (a)(18); and deleted “Arkansas” preceding “Building Authority Council” in (a)(20).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 repealed (a)(20).

The 2017 amendment by No. 776 repealed (a)(8).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1006 repealed (a)(24).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Attorney General” for “Attorney General's office” in the second sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 776, § 2: Jan. 1, 2018.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 218, § 34: Feb. 26, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the stability of the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery is critical to the success of the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; that changes to the operational structure of the lottery are needed to improve the creditability and function of the lottery; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the transition of lottery administration is as undisruptive as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1414, § 2; 2001, No. 783, §§ 4, 5; 2003, No. 1473, § 63; 2007, No. 827, § 193; 2009, No. 1484, § 9; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 59, 114; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, §§ 59, 114; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 83; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 83;
2017, No. 776, § 4; 2017, No. 1006, § 3; 2019, No. 392, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Arkansas Financial Transparency Act

25-1-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Financial Transparency Act”.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 303, § 1.

25-1-402. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

Information technology has evolved to allow unprecedented levels of accessibility to financial information;

Information technology allowing access to expenditure information via the Internet now exists and is available to state government; and

Access to expenditures on an ongoing and regular basis will:

Assist citizens and members of the General Assembly in overseeing the operation of state government in Arkansas; and

Allow for a higher degree of accountability and efficiency in the workings of all branches of state government.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 303, § 1.

25-1-403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Expenditure data” means information provided by a state agency regarding the spending of public funds that adequately identifies the purpose, amount, payor, and vendor, if such disclosure is permissible under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and federal laws or regulations.

“Expenditure data” does not include expenses of pending litigation.

“Expenditure data” includes copies of contingency fee contracts under § 25-16-715;

“State agency” means any agency, department, authority, board, commission, bureau, council, or other agency of the state excluding institutions of higher education.

“State agency” includes without limitation.

The offices of the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Commissioner of State Lands;

Legislative commissions, bureaus, and offices;

Judicial offices;

Constitutional offices, commissions and departments that receive a state appropriation for the expenditure of state funds, special revenues, or federal funds; and

The Office of the Arkansas Lottery;

“Vendor” means an entity that:

Provides goods and services within its normal business operations;

May provide similar goods and services to many different purchasers; and

Operates in a competitive environment; and

“Website” means a site on the internet:

Identifiable by a specific uniform resource locator;

Accessible to the public at no cost; and

Requiring no information of the user.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 851, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known as the ‘Transparency in Private Attorney Contracts Act’.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by No. 218 substituted “Office of the Arkansas Lottery” for “Arkansas Lottery Commission” in (2)(B)(v).

The 2015 amendment by No. 851 added (1)(C).

History.

Acts 2011, No. 303, § 1; 2015, No. 218, § 27; 2015, No. 851, § 3.

25-1-404. Duties of Department of Finance and Administration.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall:

Establish standards and criteria for each state agency to report financial expenditures;

Develop and maintain a database of financial information as set forth in this subchapter; and

Develop a website presenting expenditure data for each state agency that shall:

Report expenditure data in a common format;

Include expenditures of state government, whether held in the State Treasury or commercial bank accounts;

Allow searches of financial data in common format; and

Be updated on a regular basis to present expenditure data for the current fiscal year and prior year's annual expenditures, starting with the 2013 fiscal year.

The website shall retain expenditure data for each state fiscal year, starting with the 2013 fiscal year, until ten (10) such years are available, after which the website shall retain at least ten (10) years of expenditure data.

Revenue shall be reported at the state agency level by:

The source of funding, including without limitation donations and gifts;

General ledger codes as defined by rule of the department; and

Year to date.

A state agency shall report information on expenditures by:

Budget classification;

General ledger code as defined by rule of the department;

Year to date; and

Vendor.

A state agency shall report information on compensation of state employees by:

Agency;

Employee name;

Title;

Position number; and

Annual salary.

A state agency shall report information on bonded indebtedness by the:

Original obligation amount or principal;

Original interest rate;

Statutory authority for the debt;

Issuance date and description, including without limitation whether the current issuance is an original issue or a reissue of indebtedness;

Term of the obligation;

Source of funding for repayment; and

Remaining principal.

Information regarding payments to city and county governments shall be provided in a manner prescribed by rule of the department.

A state agency shall report information on contracts by the:

Date of contract;

Vendor;

Estimated total contract value; and

Type of contract, whether professional services, commodities, capital outlay, or other type of contract.

The department may promulgate rules to implement this section, including without limitation rules concerning the reporting of additional information under this section.

Cooperate with the Department of Finance and Administration in meeting the requirements of this subchapter; and

Take actions necessary to provide information under this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (c), substituted “Office of the Arkansas Lottery” for “Arkansas Lottery Commission” and “office” for “commission.”

History.

Acts 2011, No. 303, § 1.

25-1-405. Cooperation by state agencies with Department of Finance and Administration — Report.

Each state agency shall:

(1)The department shall report annually to the Legislative Council the name of each state agency failing to provide information under this subchapter.

A copy of the report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be posted on the website required by this subchapter immediately after presentation to the Legislative Council.

The Office of the Arkansas Lottery shall pay the costs of providing expenditure information for the office in the common format determined by the department.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 303, § 1; 2015, No. 218, § 28.

Subchapter 5

— Prohibited Contracts and Investments

25-1-501. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

Boycotts and related tactics have become tools of economic warfare that threaten the sovereignty and security of key allies and trade partners of the United States;

The State of Israel is the most prominent target of such boycott activity, which began with but has not been limited to the Arab League boycott adopted in 1945, even before Israel's declaration of independence as the reestablished national state of the Jewish people;

Companies that refuse to deal with United States trade partners such as Israel, or entities that do business with or in such countries, make discriminatory decisions on the basis of national origin that impair those companies' commercial soundness;

It is the public policy of the United States, as enshrined in several federal acts, to oppose boycotts against Israel, and the United States Congress has concluded as a matter of national trade policy that cooperation with Israel materially benefits United States companies and improves American competitiveness;

Israel in particular is known for its dynamic and innovative approach in many business sectors, and therefore a company's decision to discriminate against Israel, Israeli entities, or entities that do business with or in Israel, is an unsound business practice, making the company an unduly risky contracting partner or vehicle for investment; and

Arkansas seeks to act to implement the United States Congress's announced policy of “examining a company's promotion or compliance with unsanctioned boycotts, divestment from, or sanctions against Israel as part of its consideration in awarding grants and contracts and supports the divestment of state assets from companies that support or promote actions to boycott, divest from, or sanction Israel”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 710, §
1.

25-1-502. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Boycott Israel” and “boycott of Israel” means engaging in refusals to deal, terminating business activities, or other actions that are intended to limit commercial relations with Israel, or persons or entities doing business in Israel or in Israeli-controlled territories, in a discriminatory manner.

“Boycott” does not include those boycotts to which 50 U.S.C. § 4607(c) applies.

A company's statement that it is participating in boycotts of Israel, or that it has taken the boycott action at the request, in compliance with, or in furtherance of calls for a boycott of Israel, can be considered by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority as a type of evidence, among others, that a company is participating in a boycott of Israel;

“Company” means a sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, or other entity or business association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business associations;

“Direct holdings” in reference to a company means all publicly traded securities of that company that are held directly by the public entity in an actively managed account or fund in which the public entity owns all shares or interests;

“Indirect holdings” in reference to a company means all securities of that company that are held in an account or fund, such as a mutual fund, managed by one (1) or more persons not employed by the public entity, in which the public entity owns shares or interests together with other investors not subject to the provisions of this subchapter or that are held in an index fund;

“Public entity” means the State of Arkansas, or a political subdivision of the state, including all boards, commissions, agencies, institutions, authorities, and bodies politic and corporate of the state, created by or in accordance with state law or rules, and does include colleges, universities, a statewide public employee retirement system, and institutions in Arkansas as well as units of local and municipal government;

“Restricted companies” means companies that boycott Israel; and

“Retirement system” means a public retirement system in Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (5).

History.

Acts 2017, No. 710, §
1; 2019, No. 315, § 2909.